Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-160
McPherson.

The county of McPherson is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township seventeen, north, of range thirty, west, of the sixth principal meridian; thence north along the west boundary line of Logan County to northeast corner of township twenty, north, of range thirty, west; thence west along said township line to the northwest corner of township twenty, north, of range thirty-five, west; thence south on said range line to southwest corner of township seventeen, north, of range thirty-five, west; thence east along the north boundary line of Lincoln County to the place of beginning.

Laws 1887, c. 23, § 1, p. 346;

R.S.1913, § 873;

C.S.1922, § 775;

C.S.1929, § 25-162;

R.S.1943, § 22-160.